Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-317 Cumulation and conflict of
warranties express or implied. Warranties whether express or implied shall
be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if such
construction is unreasonable the intention of the parties shall determine which
warranty is dominant. In ascertaining that intention the following rules
apply:

(a) Exact or technical specifications displace an
inconsistent sample or model or general language of description.

(b) A sample from an existing bulk displaces
inconsistent general language of description.

(c) Express warranties displace inconsistent implied
warranties other than an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.
[L 1965, c 208, §2-317; HRS §490:2-317]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next